Illinois, session 104th, SB184.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-106 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-106)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-106)7    Sec. 4-106. Firefighter, firefighters. "Firefighter, 8firefighters":9    (a) In municipalities which have adopted Division 1 of 10Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, any person employed 11in the municipality's fire service as a firefighter, fire 12engineer, marine engineer, fire pilot, bomb technician, fire 13investigator, or scuba diver; and in any of these positions 14where such person's duties also include those of a firefighter 15as classified by the Civil Service Commission of that city, 16and whose duty is to participate in the work of controlling and 17extinguishing fires at the location of any such fires.18    (b) In municipalities which are subject to Division 2.1 of 19Article 10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, any person employed 20by a city in its fire service as a firefighter, fire engineer, 21marine engineer, fire pilot, bomb technician, fire 22investigator, or scuba diver; and, in any of these positions 23whose duties also include those of a firefighter and are   SB0184- 2 -LRB104 05833 RPS 15864 b1certified in the same manner as a firefighter in that city.2    (c) In municipalities which are subject to neither 3Division 1 nor Division 2.1 of Article 10 of the Illinois 4Municipal Code, any person who would have been included as a 5firefighter under sub-paragraph (a) or (b) above except that 6he served as a de facto and not as a de jure firefighter.7    (d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section, 8"firefighter" does not include any person who is actively 9participating in the State Universities Retirement System 10under subsection (h) of Section 15-107 with respect to the 11employment for which he or she is a participating employee in 12that System.13    (e) This amendatory Act of 1977 does not affect persons 14covered by this Article prior to September 22, 1977.15(Source: P.A. 90-576, eff. 3-31-98.) 16    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 17Section 8.49 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)19    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 208 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 21the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 22Act of the 104th General Assembly.